North Dakota, session 69, SB2098.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new chapter to title 54 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and enacted as
follows:
Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
1. "Amber alert notice" means an urgent bulletin using the emergency alert system to air a
description of a child who has been abducted.
2. "Blue alert notice" means an urgent bulletin using the emergency alert system to air a
description of an individual or an individual's vehicle to aid in the apprehension of an individual
who has threatened a law enforcement officer with a deadly weapon, used a deadly weapon
against a law enforcement officer, caused a law enforcement officer to suffer serious bodily
injury or death, abducted a law enforcement officer, or caused a law enforcement officer to go
missing while on duty, and the individual has left the scene of the offense.
3. "Missing endangered individual" means:
a. A disabled adult or elderly vulnerable adult as defined in section 50 - 25.2 - 01 who has
disappeared and whose disappearance has been reported to law enforcement;
b. An individual who has a developmental disability as defined in section 25 - 01.2 - 01 who
has disappeared and whose disappearance has been reported to law enforcement; or
c. An elderly adult who has disappeared, whose disappearance has been reported to law
enforcement and the disappearance:
(1) Indicates the individual is believed to be in grave danger of serious bodily harm or
death, as determined by a law enforcement agency and either the highway patrol or
bureau of criminal investigation, based on a report received from the missing adult's
family member or an individual who has significant frequent contact with the missing
adult, which contains sufficient evidence of the imminent risk;
(2) Warrants a silver alert notice activation due to the particular circumstances, as
determined by a law enforcement agency and either the highway patrol or bureau of
criminal investigation, based on a report received from the missing adult's family
member or an individual who has significant frequent contact with the missing adult,
which contains sufficient evidence that the particular circumstances warrant a silver
alert notice activation.
4. "Silver alert notice" means an urgent bulletin using the emergency alert system to air a
description of a missing individual to aid in the location of that individual.

S. B. NO. 2098 - PAGE 2
Alert notice system activation.
1. A law enforcement agency may request the bureau of criminal investigation or the
superintendent of the highway patrol to activate an amber alert notice, a blue alert notice, or a
silver alert notice.
2. The bureau of criminal investigation, in cooperation with the highway patrol, shall prepare an
operational plan to prepare for and respond to requests for activation of an amber alert notice,
a blue alert notice, or a silver alert notice. The plan must include the role and requirements of
the division of state radio of the department of emergency services in broadcasting an alert to
the public.
Minimum requirements for activating an amber or blue alert notice.
1. An amber alert notice may not be activated unless:
a. The abduction involves a child seventeen years of age or younger;
b. The law enforcement agency investigating the abduction has confirmed the child is
believed to be in grave danger of serious bodily harm or death; and
c. The bureau of criminal investigation or the superintendent of the highway patrol
determines sufficient descriptive information has been provided about the child, the
abductor, or the abductor's motor vehicle to:
(1) Assist with the safe recovery of the child;
(2) Assist with the apprehension of the abductor; and
(3) Believe an immediate broadcast alert will assist in the search for and safe return of
the child.
2. A blue alert notice may not be activated unless:
a. An individual who is a suspect in an offense has threatened a law enforcement officer
with a deadly weapon, used a deadly weapon against a law enforcement officer, caused
a law enforcement officer to suffer serious bodily injury or death, abducted a law
enforcement officer, or caused a law enforcement officer to go missing while on duty;
b. The individual has fled the scene of the offense and a description of the individual or the
individual's vehicle is available for broadcast;
c. The law enforcement agency investigating the offense has determined the individual
poses a threat to the public or other law enforcement personnel; and
d. Dissemination of available information to the public may help avert further harm or assist
in the apprehension of the suspect.
SECTION 2. REPEAL. Sections 39-03-13.2 and 54-12-32 of the North Dakota Century Code are
repealed.

S. B. NO. 2098 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2098.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 88 Nays 0 Absent 6
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State